Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-446
Plan of reorganization; approval; special election.

When a plan of reorganization or any part thereof has been approved by the state committee, it shall be designated as the final approved plan and shall be returned to the school districts to be submitted to a vote as provided in section 79-447.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 13, p. 678;

Laws 1963, c. 479, § 8, p. 1542;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.13;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 195;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 49.

Contest of special election under this section is authorized. Arends v. Whitten, 172 Neb. 297, 109 N.W.2d 363 (1961).

County committee submits plan of reorganization at special election. Nickel v. School Board of Axtell, 157 Neb. 813, 61 N.W.2d 566 (1953).